Oklahoma, session 2025, SB523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 547.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 14, O.S.L. 2022 (19 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 547.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 547.1. A. Any Oklahoma sheriff, deputy sheriff, or a
reserve deputy sheriff who is assigned to perform duties associated
with the National Sheriffs’ Association annual conference within
Oklahoma County during the month of June 2024, outside of his or her
county of employment shall have the same powers and duties as though
employed by the Oklahoma County Sheriff’s Office sheriff’s office
for which he or she is performing duties. Liability for the conduct
of any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or reserve deputy sheriff, while
performing duties during the National Sheriffs’ Association annual
conference or any activities in conjunction with that conference for
June 2024 outside of his or her county of employment, shall remain
the responsibility of the counties of county in which they are he or
she is regularly employed. Salaries, insurance, and other benefits
shall be provided in the regular manner by the county in which the

sheriffs sheriff, deputy sheriffs sheriff, and or reserve deputy
sheriffs are sheriff is regularly employed.
B. Any duties assigned to sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, and
reserve deputy sheriffs as a result of this section shall terminate
on July 1, 2024.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 523 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 523 Page 3